Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-409
License required; exceptions.

No person shall be authorized to perform the functions outlined in section 38-408 unless the person first obtains a license as an athletic trainer or unless such person is licensed as a physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, nurse, physical therapist, or podiatrist. No person shall hold himself or herself out as an athletic trainer in this state unless such person is licensed under the Athletic Training Practice Act or the Athletic Trainer Compact.

Laws 1986, LB 355, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 27;

Laws 1999, LB 178, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 67;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,240;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 181;

Laws 2022, LB436, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 10.
January 1, 2027
Athletic Trainer Compact, see section 38-5201.